Illinois, session 104th, HB3767.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $50,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Public Health for a grant to NORC at 7the University of Chicago for the purposes of data collection 8of supply and demand. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.